Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1468
Rental agreement, defined.

Rental agreement shall mean any agreement, written or implied by law, and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to section 76-1494 which constitute the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a mobile home space.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 19.